Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF283.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1342SV (2) 91 jda/jh S.F. 283 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 256.231 Comprehensive transition 1 and postsecondary program scholarship program. 2 1. If moneys are appropriated by the general assembly for 3 a fiscal year for the purpose provided in this section, the 4 college student aid commission shall, in consultation with 5 the division of vocational rehabilitation services of the 6 department of workforce development, develop and administer 7 a scholarship program to provide scholarships to individuals 8 with intellectual, developmental, or learning disabilities who 9 are at least eighteen years of age and who are enrolled in 10 a comprehensive transition and postsecondary program in this 11 state that has been approved by the United States department 12 of education, to help offset the cost associated with the 13 comprehensive transition and postsecondary programâs tuition 14 and fees. 15 2. The amount awarded to an individual under this section 16 shall not exceed five thousand dollars per academic year. An 17 individual must file a new application and submit information 18 as required by the college student aid commission annually on 19 the basis of which the individualâs eligibility for a renewed 20 award will be evaluated and determined. 21 3. The college student aid commission, in consultation 22 with the division of vocational rehabilitation services of 23 the department of workforce development, shall establish the 24 evaluation criteria to be used in evaluating applications for 25 scholarships submitted under this section. Priority shall be 26 given to applicants who are residents of Iowa. 27 4. The college student aid commission, in consultation 28 with the division of vocational rehabilitation services of the 29 department of workforce development, shall adopt rules pursuant 30 to chapter 17A to administer this section. 31 5. A comprehensive transition and postsecondary program 32 scholarship program fund is established in the state treasury. 33 The fund shall be administered by the college student aid 34 commission, in consultation with the division of vocational 35 -1- LSB 1342SV (2) 91 jda/jh 1/ 3 S.F. 283 rehabilitation services of the department of workforce 1 development, and shall consist of moneys appropriated by the 2 general assembly and any other moneys received by the college 3 student aid commission for deposit in the fund. The moneys in 4 the fund are appropriated to the college student aid commission 5 for the comprehensive transition and postsecondary program 6 scholarship program. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys in 7 the fund at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert to 8 the general fund of the state but shall remain available for 9 expenditure for the comprehensive transition and postsecondary 10 program scholarship program for subsequent fiscal years. 11 Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2, interest or 12 earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund. 13